Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 36
COMMODITIES HANDLERS AND FARM PRODUCTS

Editor's note:

This article 36 was numbered as article 14 of chapter 7, C.R.S. 1963. It was repealed in 1976, recreated and reenacted in 2017, and amended with relocations in 2020, resulting in the addition, relocation, or elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article 36 prior to 2020, consult the 2019 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers prior to 2020 are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article 36 for 2017 and 2020, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

PART 1 COMMON PROVISIONS

PART 2 COMMODITIES

PART 3 FARM PRODUCTS